Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.250

City contracts to obtain sheriff's office law enforcement services—Transfer of police department employees.

When any city or town shall contract with the county sheriff's office to obtain law enforcement services to the city or town, any employee of the police department of such city or town who (1) was at the time such contract was entered into employed exclusively or principally in performing the powers, duties, and functions which are to be performed by the county sheriff's office under such contract (2) will, as a direct consequence of such contract, be separated from the employ of the city or town, and (3) meets the minimum standards and qualifications of the county sheriff's office, then such employee may transfer his or her employment to the county sheriff's office as provided for in RCW 41.14.260 and 41.14.270.

[ 2012 c 117 s 17; 1972 ex.s. c 48 s 1.]